Wyoming, session 2025, HB0281.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-3-105(b) is amended to read:

23-3-105. Antelope, deer and elk coupons; payment to
landowner; kill on federal or state land.

HB0281

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0425
(b) When hunting on a landowner's property, upon
harvesting an antelope, deer or elk or at the conclusion of
a hunt without harvesting an antelope, deer or elk, the
landowner's coupon shall promptly be detached, dated,
signed and delivered to the landowner on whose property the
antelope, deer or elk was harvested or, if no antelope,
deer or elk was harvested, on whose property a hunter
utilized a hunting license for the majority of a hunting
season. The landowner, on or before March 1 following the
close of the hunting season for which the license was
issued, shall deliver to the department the coupon and an
affidavit that the antelope, deer or elk for which the
coupon was delivered was killed on his land or that a
hunter utilized a hunting license on his land for the
majority of a hunting season if no antelope, deer or elk
was taken. Upon receipt of the coupon and affidavit the
department shall pay the landowner sixteen dollars ($16.00)
for each coupon from an antelope, deer or elk license.
Landowner's coupons are not transferable. Any unauthorized
person attempting to collect any sum for any landowner's
coupon is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as
provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). Effective January 1,
2000, the department shall provide a checkoff box on each
HB0281

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0425
landowner coupon affidavit claim form that offers the
claimant the opportunity to designate the animal damage
management board to receive his payment amount for
landowner coupons claimed on that form. For each claim made
where the landowner has designated his payment to the
animal damage management board, the department shall
transfer that amount to the animal damage management
account created by W.S. 11-6-306 and the department shall
retain the fees related to those administrative costs of
the transfer.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0281